Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General
§ 31-5-112.
Adoption of uniform system of traffic-control devices.

The department shall adopt a manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic-control devices consistent with this act for use upon highways within this state. The uniform system shall correlate with and so far as possible conform to the system set forth in the most recent edition of the “Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways” and other standards issued or endorsed by the federal highway administrator.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 60-611; W.S. 1957, § 31-89; Laws 1963, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-113

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Regulations contained in adopted manual become law of state.—

Where officials are required by law to adopt a manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic-control devices for use upon highways within this state, the regulations contained in the adopted manual become the law of this state just as much as any other regulation authorized by the legislature. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

No negligence where “substantial compliance” with manual. —

In a negligence action arising from a single car accident in a construction area, there was no negligence on the part of the state where the signs and detour were in “substantial compliance” with the “Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways,” with only minor deviations, the injured driver of the car knew the lay-out of the detour from having driven through it minutes before the accident, and he was travelling at a speed which exceeded all legal limits. Randolph v. Gilpatrick Constr. Co., 702 P.2d 142,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 498

(Wyo. 1985).

In a negligence action against the contractor on a highway project, where the driver of a vehicle failed to negotiate a sharp curve, neither the highway department nor its general contractor was negligent where the department's practices were in substantial compliance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and the contractor's placement of warning signs conformed to the department's directions. Miller v. Rissler & McMurry Co., 794 P.2d 91,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 31-5-113.
Placement and maintenance of traffic-control devices by department.

The department shall place and maintain such traffic-control devices, conforming to the department’s manual and specifications, upon all state highways as it deems necessary to indicate and to carry out this act or to regulate, warn or guide traffic.

No local authority shall place or maintain any traffic-control device upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the highway department except with the highway department’s permission.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 60-612; W.S. 1957, § 31-90; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-114

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

No negligence where substantial compliance with manual. —

In a negligence action against the contractor on a highway project, where the driver of a vehicle failed to negotiate a sharp curve, neither the highway department nor its general contractor was negligent where the department's practices were in substantial compliance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and the contractor's placement of warning signs conformed to the department's directions. Miller v. Rissler & McMurry Co., 794 P.2d 91,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Highways: governmental duty to provide curve warnings or markings, 57 ALR4th 342.

Governmental liability for failure to post highway deer crossing warning signs, 59 ALR4th 1217.

§ 31-5-114.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-602

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning the moving of heavy equipment or railroad grade crossings, see §

31-18-602

.

§ 31-5-115.
Operation of motorcycles, autocycles and pedestrian vehicles.

A person operating a motorcycle shall ride only upon or astride the seat designed to be used by the driver, including a seat that incorporates a wheelchair or other assistive device, and shall not carry any other person nor shall any other person ride on a motorcycle unless the motorcycle is designed to carry more than one (1) person, in which event a passenger may ride upon or astride the regular seat if designed for two (2) persons, or upon another seat firmly attached to the motorcycle at the rear or side of the operator.

A person shall ride a motorcycle only upon or astride a seat designed to be used by the driver or, if the person is a passenger, a seat designed to be used by a passenger. If the seat is a saddle, a person shall only sit astride the saddle, facing forward, with one (1) leg on each side of the motorcycle.

No person shall operate a motorcycle while carrying any package, bundle or other article which prevents him from keeping both hands on the handlebars, or obstructs his vision, or interferes with the operation of the motorcycle.

No operator shall carry any person, nor shall any person ride in a position that will interfere with the operation or control of the motorcycle or the view of the operator.

All motorcycles are entitled to full use of a lane and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle of the full use of a lane. Two (2) motorcycles may be driven abreast in the same lane by consent of both motorcycle drivers. One (1) autocycle may be driven per lane.

The operator of a motorcycle shall not overtake and pass any vehicle in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken, except another motorcycle. The operator of a motorcycle overtaking another motorcycle in the same lane shall first match the speed of the motorcycle being overtaken.

No person shall operate a motorcycle between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.

Subsections (f) and (g) of this section do not apply to police officers in the performance of their official duties.

Motorcycles shall not be operated three (3) or more abreast in a single lane.

No person riding upon a motorcycle shall attach himself or the motorcycle to any other moving vehicle on a roadway. This does not prohibit:

Attaching a motorcycle trailer or motorcycle semitrailer to a motorcycle if the trailer or semitrailer is designed for the attachment;

Attaching a person, wheelchair or other assistive device as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxxiii) to a motorcycle if the motorcycle is designed for the attachment.

Any motorcycle carrying a passenger, other than in a sidecar or enclosed cab, shall be equipped with footrests for the passenger.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 44, § 2.

No minor shall operate or ride nor shall the operator permit a minor to ride upon a motorcycle unless he is wearing protective headgear securely fastened on his head, and of a type which complies with standards established by the superintendent. This subsection does not apply to persons riding within an enclosed cab nor to persons operating or riding a moped. This subsection only applies to motorcycles used on public highways, streets and thoroughfares.

Any person operating a motorcycle or pedestrian vehicle shall have the headlamps of the motorcycle or pedestrian vehicle activated at all times, including daylight hours.

Operators of motorcycles operating in an officially authorized parade are exempt from subsections (e) through (o) of this section.

The superintendent is authorized to approve or disapprove protective headgear required herein, and to issue and enforce regulations establishing standards and specifications for the approval thereof and to the sale and use of the equipment as provided in W.S.

31-5-932

through

31-5-934

for other vehicle safety equipment. The standard for protective headgear shall meet or exceed the Z90.1-1971 standard of the American National Standards Institute. However, all existing equipment meeting the Z90.1-1966 standard of the American National Standards Institute shall be accepted.

This section applies to motor-driven cycles unless otherwise provided.

Subsections (b) through (d), (n), (o) and (r) of this section shall not apply to autocycles.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 95; C.S. 1945, § 60-695; W.S. 1957, § 31-92; Laws 1973, ch. 232, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-116

; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 89, § 2; 1983, ch. 30, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1987, ch. 145, § 1; 2004, ch. 16, § 1; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2022 ch. 44, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last sentence in (e); added the exception and last sentence in (f); and substituted “three (3)” for “two (2)” in (j).

The 2017 amendment,

in (e), added the last sentence; and added (t).

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 44, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, in (a), added “or astride” following “ride only,” deleted “permanent and regular” preceding “seat,” substituted “designed to be used by the driver, including a seat that incorporates a wheelchair or other assistive device,” for “attached thereto,” added “or astride” following “may ride upon,” deleted “permanent and” preceding “regular seat”; rewrote (b), which read, “A person shall ride upon a motorcycle only while sitting astride the seat, facing forward, with one (1) leg on each side of the motorcycle”; added (k)(i) designation; substituted “is” for “was” in present (k)(i); added (k)(ii); repealed former (n), which read, “No person shall operate any motorcycle with handlebars so positioned that the hands of the operator, when upon the grips, are above shoulder height when the operator is sitting astride the vehicle seat with the vehicle in an upright position”; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section

31-5-933

, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (r), was repealed in 1985.

Violation of provisions evidence of reckless intent. —

Evidence that the defendant violated this section, and §§ 31-5-203(a)(i), 31-5-210(a) and

31-5-301

could form a basis for the conclusion that the defendant was driving in a manner that he knew, or should have known, was highly dangerous to others and that he did so intentionally, or heedlessly, with a careless indifference to the consequences. Harvey v. State, 596 P.2d 1386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Overcrowding motor vehicle or riding in unusual position thereon as affecting liability for injury or damage, 44 ALR2d 238.

Motorcyclist's failure to wear helmet or other protective equipment as affecting recovery for personal injury or death, 85 ALR4th 365.

Validity of traffic regulations requiring motorcyclists to wear helmets or other protective gear, 72 ALR5th 607.

§ 31-5-116.
Obstruction to driver's view or driving mechanism.

No person shall drive a vehicle when it is loaded, or when there are in the front seat enough people, exceeding three (3), to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or sides of the vehicle or to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No passenger in a vehicle shall ride in such position as to interfere with the driver’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with his control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 96; C.S. 1945, § 60-696; W.S. 1957, § 31-93; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-117

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-117.
Dropping or throwing material on highway; removal of injurious material.

Except in the process of highway construction or repair, any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown, upon a highway any material shall immediately remove the material or cause it to be removed.

Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other substance dropped upon the highway from the vehicle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 101; C.S. 1945, § 60-701; W.S. 1957, § 31-94; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-118

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Construction of subsection (a) prior to 1984 amendment. —

See Dubus v. Dresser Indus., 649 P.2d 198,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 366

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of highway user for injuries resulting from failure to remove or protect against material spilled from vehicle onto public street or highway, 34 ALR4th 520.

§ 31-5-118.
Regulations relative to school buses.

The state superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and enforce regulations not inconsistent with this act to govern the design and operation of all school buses used for the transportation of school children when owned and operated by any school district or privately owned and operated under contract with any school district in this state and the regulations shall by reference be made a part of any contract with a school district. Every school district, its officers and employees, and every person employed under contract by a school district shall be subject to the regulations.

Any officer or employee of any school district who violates any of the regulations or fails to include obligation to comply with the regulations in any contract executed by him on behalf of a school district is guilty of misconduct and subject to removal from office or employment. Any person operating a school bus under contract with a school district who fails to comply with the regulations is guilty of breach of contract and the contract shall be cancelled after notice and hearing by the responsible officers of the school district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 102; C.S. 1945, § 60-702; W.S. 1957, § 31-95; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-119

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 1995, ch. 63, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to liability insurance on school buses, see §

21-3-126

.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director of the department of education” for “state superintendent of public instruction” in (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in the first sentence in (a), substituted “state superintendent of public instruction” for “director of the department of education.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents associated with transportation of students, 23 ALR5th 1.

§ 31-5-119.
Clinging to vehicles.

No person riding upon any bicycle, electric bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled or toy vehicle shall attach it or himself to any vehicle upon a roadway.

This section does not prohibit attaching a bicycle trailer or bicycle semitrailer to a bicycle or electric bicycle if the trailer or semitrailer was designed for the attachment.

No person operating a vehicle shall permit a passenger to ride on the fender or running board of the vehicle nor shall any passenger ride on the fender or running board of a vehicle. This subsection does not apply to a commercial vehicle or a vehicle operated by or for a political subdivision of this state designed to permit a passenger to ride on a fender or running board, such as a fire department or trash collection truck.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225,§ 77; C.S. 1945, § 60-677; W.S. 1957, § 31-97; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-121

; Laws 1984, ch. 48,§ 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added "electric bicycle"; and in (b), added "or electric bicycle."

§ 31-5-120.
Driving upon sidewalk.

No person shall drive any vehicle except motorized wheelchairs other than by human power upon a sidewalk or sidewalk area except upon a permanent or duly authorized temporary driveway.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-121.
Opening and closing vehicle doors.

No person shall open any door on a motor vehicle unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so and can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic, nor shall any person leave a door open on a side of a vehicle available to moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload passengers.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-122.
Riding in house trailers.

No person shall occupy a house trailer while it is being towed upon a public highway.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-123.
Funeral processions; right-of-way; limitations.

A funeral procession led by a funeral car or escorted by a police vehicle and displaying flashing lights authorized under W.S.

31-5-928

has the right-of-way in the lane or portion of the roadway upon which it is traveling subject to the following:

The driver of the lead vehicle of the procession shall comply with all traffic control devices except when otherwise directed by a law enforcement officer. Vehicles in the procession displaying headlamps may follow the lead vehicle without stopping at stop signs or traffic signals. Vehicles in the procession shall yield the right-of-way to authorized emergency vehicles;

Vehicles in a funeral procession shall be driven on the right-hand side of the roadway and, if a laned roadway, in the right-hand lane nearest the right-hand edge of the roadway.

Drivers of oncoming vehicles are required to yield the right-of-way to funeral processions.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 60, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury or damages resulting from operation of vehicle in funeral procession or in procession which is claimed to have such legal status, 52 ALR5th 155.

§ 31-5-124.
Off-road recreational vehicles; multipurpose vehicles; limitation on use; equipment.

No person shall operate an off-road recreational vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K) upon public streets or highways except:

For incidental operation of vehicles specified in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K), upon a public street or highway located outside the limits of an incorporated municipality pursuant to agricultural operations as defined in W.S. 31-18-801(a)(i). An off-road recreational vehicle operated upon a public street or highway under this paragraph is subject to the same equipment requirements under this act as an implement of husbandry, except that vehicles specified in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II), when operated pursuant to this paragraph, shall:

Wherever practicable, only be operated off the main traveled portion of the roadway. Crossings of main traveled roadways shall be made at right angles to the roadway or as nearly so as practicable, but in any case yielding the right-of-way to all traffic in the main traveled roadway;

If the operator is a minor, or if a minor is a rider, be operated with a helmet in accordance with W.S. 31-5-115(o);

Be operated only by a person who possesses a valid driver’s license with a motorcycle endorsement pursuant to W.S. 31-7-109(d)(vi).

For operation of a vehicle in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

31-5-1601

;

For off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

.

Multipurpose vehicles may be operated on public streets or highways, subject to the following:

Multipurpose vehicles shall not be operated on interstate highways;

If a multipurpose vehicle is incapable of achieving the maximum speed allowed on the specific highway, it shall be operated on the extreme right hand edge of the roadway and shall be equipped with either a reflectorized flag as described in W.S. 31-5-960(a)(vi) or a slow moving vehicle emblem as described in W.S. 31-5-921(h);

Multipurpose vehicles designed for operation at speeds less than twenty-five (25) miles per hour shall be equipped with a slow moving vehicle emblem as described in W.S. 31-5-921(h).

Off-road recreational vehicles shall not be operated on interstate highways.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 88, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 12, § 2; 2004, ch. 35, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to registration of off-road recreational vehicles used on off-road recreational vehicle trails, see article 7 of chapter 2 of this title.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i), substituted “31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)” for “31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(I),” and added the limitations at the end, including (a)(i)(A) through (C).

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, added (b).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(iii) and made a related change; and added (c).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: all-terrain vehicles (ATV's), 83 ALR4th 70.